Washington statutes.
RCW 32.04.100

Penalty for falsification.

Every person who knowingly subscribes to or makes or causes to be made any false statement or false entry in the books of any savings bank or its holding company, or knowingly subscribes to or exhibits any false or fictitious security, document or paper, with the intent to deceive any person authorized to examine into the affairs of any savings bank or its holding company, or makes or publishes any false statement of the amount of the assets or liabilities of any such savings bank or its holding company is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2010 c 88 s 41; 2003 c 53 s 194; 1955 c 13 s 32.04.100. Prior: 1931 c 132 s 11; RRS s 3379b.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.